Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-725
State; lands necessary for state use; right of eminent domain; procedure.

The State of Nebraska may acquire, by eminent domain, lands necessary for any state use. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1913, c. 9, § 1, p. 69;

R.S.1913, § 7389;

Laws 1921, c. 264, § 1, p. 883;

C.S.1922, § 7064;

C.S.1929, § 83-1601;

R.S.1943, § 83-601;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 121, p. 504;

R.R.S.1943, § 83-601.

A mortgagee is a necessary party in an action to condemn real estate for public use of the state. Northwestern Mutual Life Ins. Co. v. Nordhues, 129 Neb. 379, 261 N.W. 687 (1935).